Utah statutes.
31A-8-301.   Requirements for doing business in state.

(1)  Only a corporation incorporated and licensed under Part 2, Domestic Organizations, may do business in this state as an organization.

(2)  To do business in this state as an organization, foreign corporations doing a similar business in other states shall incorporate a subsidiary and license if under Part 2, Domestic Organizations, for its Utah business.  Except as to Chapter 16, Insurance Holding Companies, the laws applicable to domestic organizations apply only to the organization and not to its foreign parent corporation.

